Nebraska, session 109, LB831.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB831 LB831
2026 2026
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 5 of this act:
(1) Conduct refers to acts of commission and omission;
(2)(a) Ethylene oxide exposure action means a civil action seeking
damages for personal injury caused by the exposure of an individual to
ethylene oxide.
(b) Ethylene oxide exposure action does not include any claim
covered by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act; and
(3) Health care business means a person engaged in business in the
health care industry, including the manufacturing, sale and distribution,
sterilization, storage, and transportation of medical devices.
Sec. 2. A health care business shall not be liable for damages in
an ethylene oxide exposure action unless the plaintiff proves by clear
and convincing evidence that:
(1) The conduct of the health care business giving rise to the
action was not in substantial compliance with relevant federal laws and
regulations;
(2) At the time of such conduct, the health care business was not
making reasonable efforts, in light of all the circumstances, to maintain
substantial compliance with such federal laws and regulations;
(3) Such conduct amounted to gross negligence or willful misconduct;
and
(4) Such conduct directly and proximately resulted in the
plaintiff's exposure to ethylene oxide and directly and proximately
caused personal injury to the plaintiff.
Sec. 3. (1) In any ethylene oxide exposure action, the plaintiff
shall plead with particularity:
(a) Each element of the plaintiff's claim; and
(b) Each alleged act or omission constituting gross negligence or
willful misconduct that resulted in personal injury caused by exposure to
ethylene oxide.
(2) In any ethylene oxide exposure action, the plaintiff shall file
-2-

LB831 LB831
2026 2026
with the complaint a statement of specific information as to the nature
and amount of each element of damages claimed and the factual basis for
the damages calculation.
(3) In any ethylene oxide exposure action in which a claim is
asserted on which the plaintiff may prevail only on proof that the
defendant acted with a particular state of mind, there shall be filed
with the complaint, with respect to each element of that claim, a
statement of the facts giving rise to a strong inference that the
defendant acted with the required state of mind.
Sec. 4. (1) Sections 1 to 5 of this act constitute an exclusive
cause of action for ethylene oxide exposure actions.
(2) A plaintiff may prevail in an ethylene oxide exposure action
only in accordance with the requirements of sections 1 to 5 of this act.
Sec. 5. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall apply to:
(1) An ethylene oxide exposure action that was filed before the
effective date of this act and that is pending on such date; and
(2) Any ethylene oxide exposure action filed on or after the
effective date of this act.
-3-